Hawaii statutes.
§662-7 Attorney general. The State
shall be represented by the attorney general of the State in all actions under
this chapter. [L 1957, c 312, pt of §1; Supp, §245A-7; HRS §662-7]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next